Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,117
Amendment terminating members or redeeming or canceling memberships.

(a) Any amendment to the articles or bylaws of a public benefit or mutual benefit corporation that would terminate all members or any class of members or redeem or cancel all memberships or any class of memberships must meet the requirements of the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act and this section.

(b) Before adopting a resolution proposing such an amendment, the board of a mutual benefit corporation shall give notice of the general nature of the amendment to the members.

(c) After adopting a resolution proposing such an amendment, the notice to members proposing such amendment shall include one statement of up to five hundred words opposing the proposed amendment if such statement is submitted by any five members or members having three percent or more of the voting power, whichever is less, not later than twenty days after the board has voted to submit such amendment to the members for their approval. In public benefit corporations the production and mailing costs shall be paid by the requesting members. In mutual benefit corporations the production and mailing costs shall be paid by the corporation.

(d) Any such amendment shall be approved by the members by two-thirds of the votes cast by each class.

(e) The provisions of section 21-1947 shall not apply to any amendment meeting the requirements of the act and this section.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 117.